Maine, session 132, LD1400.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §850-F, sub-§8-A is enacted to read:
8-A. School districts exemption. A school district that meets the requirements of
section 850-S is not required to remit premiums to the fund under this section.
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §850-S is enacted to read:
§850-S. Substitution of benefits provided by school districts
An employer that is a school district meets its obligations under this subchapter if:
1. Substantially equivalent benefits. The school district provided family leave and
medical leave benefits substantially equivalent to those provided under this subchapter
pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on January 1, 2025; and
2. Continually maintains benefits. The school district continually maintains paid
family leave and medical leave benefits for employees substantially equivalent to those
provided under this subchapter pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement or other
contractual agreement, including benefits for sick leave and family sick leave, that accrue
annually to at least 12 weeks of leave.
Sec. 3. Department of Labor to refund contributions made by school
districts. The Department of Labor shall refund contributions made to the department
pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 26, section 850-F made by a school district
that meets the requirements of Title 26, section 850-S. A school district employer that
deducted a portion of the premium to the employee as part of the employee's wage shall
remit that portion of the premium to the employee as part of the employee's wage.
Sec. 4. Retroactivity. This Act applies retroactively to October 25, 2023.